Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1207
Bridges; right of eminent domain; procedure.

If any city of the metropolitan class desires to acquire any existing bridge or lease of such bridge or all interests in such bridge by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, and has received any such authority as necessary from the government of the United States, such city may exercise such power in such manner as Congress may require. If the manner is not prescribed by Congress, the procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 7, p. 614;

C.S.1929, § 14-1207;

Laws 1935, c. 28, § 2, p. 124;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1207;

R.S.1943, § 14-1207;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 39, p. 463;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 245.